tr: Havuz tipi: Yer üstü; Gömme; Şişirilebilir; Çocuk havuzu; Kulvarlı; Dalış; Sığ havuz; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de piscina: Acima do solo; Enterrada; Insuflável; Criança; Raia; Mergulho; Rasa; Outro
nb: Bassengtype: Over bakken; I bakken; Oppblåsbar; Barne; Runde; Stupe; Vading; Annet
bg-BG: Тип басейн: Над земята; В земята; Надуваемо; Детски; За дължина; За скок и потапяне; Газене; Друго
sk-SK: Typ bazéna: Nad zemou; V zemi; Nafukovací; Pre deti; Okruh; Ponorný; Plytký; Iné
sv: Pooltyp: Ovan jord; markmonterad; Uppblåsbar; Barn; Knä; Djup urringning; Vadning; Övrigt
ko: 수영장 유형: 지상; 매립형; 공기주입식; 키디; 랩; 플런지; 웨이딩; 기타
el: Τύπος πισίνας: Υπέργεια; Εντοιχισμένη; Φουσκωτή; Παιδάκι; Κολυμβητική; Μικρού βάθους; Βαδίζοντας; Άλλο
fr: Type de piscine: Hors sol; Creusée; Gonflable; Pour enfants; Genoux; Plongeant; Piscine peu profonde; Autre
da: Pooltype: Over jorden; I jorden; Oppustelig; Børn; Lap; Plunge; Vadning; Andet
hu: Medence típusa: Föld felett; Földben; Felfújható; Gyerek; Úszómedence; Merülőmedence; Pancsoló; Egyéb
zh-TW: 泳池類型: 地上; 地面; 充氣式; 兒童; 長形泳池; 冷水浴池; 淺水; 其他
ru: Тип бассейна: Наземный; Заглубленный; Надувной; Детский; Плавательный; Купель; Мелководный; Другой
hr-HR: Vrsta bazena: Iznad zemlje; Tlo; Na napuhavanje; Za malenu djecu; Oko struka; Plunge; Dječji plitki; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta bazena: Nad zemljo; Talni; Napihljiv; Otroški; Varnostni; Globok izrez; Brodenje; Druga
lt-LT: Baseino tipas: Viršžeminis; Ant žemės; Pripučiamas; Vaikas; Juosmens; Giluminis; Braidymas; Kita
it: Tipo di piscina: Fuori terra; Interrata; Gonfiabile; Bambino; Giro; Caduta; Guadare; Altro
th: ประเภทสระว่ายน้ำ: เหนือพื้นดิน; ปักดิน; เติมลม; สระเด็ก; พาดตัก; แบบคว้านอกลึก; สระน้ำตื้น; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ basenu: Nadziemny; Wbudowany w ziemię; Nadmuchiwane; Dla dzieci; Sportowe; Wgłębne; Brodzik; Inne
ja: プールの種類: 地上; 地中; インフレータブル; キディ; ラップ; プランジ; ウェーディング; その他
nl: Zwembadtype: Bovengronds; Inbouw; Opblaasbaar; Peuterbad; Baantjes; Plons; Ondiep bad; Overig
vi: Loại hồ bơi: Trên mặt đất; Âm đất; Bơm hơi; Dành cho trẻ em; Vòng; Hồ bơi nhỏ; Lội nước; Khác
en: Pool type: Above-ground; In-ground; Inflatable; Kiddie; Lap; Plunge; Wading; Other
zh-CN: 泳池类型: 地上式; 地下式; 充气式; 儿童泳池; 泳道池; 浅水池; 浅水池; 其他
es: Tipo de piscina: Sobre el suelo; En el suelo; Inflable; Niño; Campana; Escote profundo; Poco profunda; Otros
de: Pooltyp: Oberirdisch; Im Boden; Aufblasbar; Planschbecken; Bahnen; Plunge; Kinderbecken; Sonstiges
cs: Typ bazénu: Nadzemní; Zapuštěné; Nafukovací; Dětský bazének; Kondiční plavání; Ochlazovací; Brouzdaliště; Jiné
fi: Altaan tyyppi: Maanpäällinen; Maahanrakennettu; Täytettävä; Lasten; Kuntorata-allas; Pulahdusallas; Kahluu; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de piscina: Acima do solo; No solo; Inflável; Infantil; Colo; Sutiã em V; Área rasa para recreação; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul piscinei: Suprateran; Îngropat; Gonflabil; Pentru copii; De înot; De scufundare; Piscină mică; Altele